Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4710
Protection of third person.

(a) With respect to property to which the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act applies, a person is not liable under the Uniform Community Property Disposition at Death Act to the extent the person:

(1) transacts in good faith and for value:

(A) with a community-property spouse; or

(B) after the death of the decedent, with a surviving community-property spouse, personal representative, heir, devisee, or nonprobate transferee of the decedent; and

(2) does not know or have reason to know that the other party to the transaction is exceeding or improperly exercising the party's authority.

(b) Good faith under subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not require the person to inquire into the extent or propriety of the exercise of authority by the other party to the transaction.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 10.